Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.260

Governor designated state's agent.

The governor is designated the agent of the state to accept and receive all funds from federal and other sources not otherwise provided for by law and to deposit them in the state treasury to the credit of the appropriate fund or account.

[ 1973 c 144 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.260. Prior: 1945 c 243 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 5517-12.]